California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
 PercentageAlameda 4.5046Alpine 0.0137Amador 0.1512Butte 0.8131Calaveras 0.1367Colusa0.1195Contra Costa 2.2386Del Norte 0.1340El Dorado 0.5228Fresno 2.3531Glenn 0.1391Humboldt 0.8929Imperial 0.8237Inyo 0.1869Kern 1.6362Kings 0.4084Lake 0.1752Lassen 0.1525Los Angeles 37.2606 Madera 0.3656Marin1.0785Mariposa 0.0815Mendocino 0.2586Merced 0.4094Modoc 0.0923Mono 0.1342Monterey 0.8975Napa 0.4466Nevada 0.2734Orange 5.4304Placer 0.2806Plumas 0.1145Riverside 2.7867Sacramento 2.7497San Benito 0.1701San Bernardino2.4709San Diego 4.7771San Francisco 7.1450San Joaquin 1.0810San Luis Obispo 0.4811San Mateo 1.5937Santa Barbara 0.9418Santa Clara 3.6238Santa Cruz 0.6714Shasta 0.6732Sierra 0.0340Siskiyou0.2246Solano 0.9377Sonoma 1.6687Stanislaus 1.0509Sutter 0.4460Tehama 0.2986Trinity 0.1388Tulare 0.7485Tuolumne 0.2357Ventura 1.3658Yolo 0.3522Yuba 0.3076Berkeley 0.0692Long Beach 0.2918Pasadena 0.1385(3) For the 1992–93, 1993–94, and 1994–95 fiscal years and fiscal years thereafter, allocations shall be made in the same amounts as were distributed from the Vehicle License Fee Account and the Vehicle License Fee Growth Account in the prior fiscal year.

(4) For the 1995–96 fiscal year, allocations shall be made in the same amounts as distributed in the 1994–95 fiscal year from the Vehicle License Fee Account and the Vehicle License Fee Growth Account after adjusting the allocation amounts by the amounts specified for the following counties:Alpine $(11,296)Amador 25,417Calaveras 49,892Del Norte 39,537Glenn (12,238)Lassen 17,886Mariposa (6,950)Modoc (29,182)Mono (6,950)San Benito 20,710Sierra (39,537)Trinity (48,009)(5) (A) For the 1996–97 fiscal year and fiscal years thereafter, allocations shall be made in the same amounts as were distributed from the Vehicle License Fee Account and the Vehicle License Fee Growth Account in the prior fiscal year.

(B) Initial proceeds deposited in the Vehicle License Fee Account in the 2003–04 fiscal year in the amount that would otherwise have been transferred pursuant to former Section 10754 of the Revenue and Taxation Code for the period June 20, 2003, to July 15, 2003, inclusive, shall be deemed to have been deposited during the period June 16, 2003, to July 15, 2003, inclusive, and allocated to cities, counties, and a city and county during the 2002–03 fiscal year.

(d) The Controller shall make monthly allocations
 from the amount deposited in the Vehicle License Collection Account of the Local Revenue Fund to each county in accordance with a schedule to be developed by the State Department of Health Care Services in consultation with the County Behavioral Health Directors Association of California, which is compatible with the intent of the Legislature expressed in the act adding this subdivision.

(e) For the 2013–14 and 2014–15 fiscal years, before making the monthly allocations in accordance with paragraph (5) of subdivision (c) and subdivision (d), and pursuant to a schedule provided by the Department of Finance, the Controller shall adjust the monthly distributions from the Vehicle License Fee Account to reflect an equal exchange of sales and use tax funds from the Social Services Subaccount to the Health Subaccount, as required by subdivisions (d) and (e) of Section 17600.15, and of Vehicle License Fee funds from the Health Account to the Social
 Services Account. Adjustments made to the Vehicle License Fee distributions pursuant to this subdivision shall not be used in calculating future year allocations to the Vehicle License Fee Account.

(f) For the 2015–16 fiscal year, of the vehicle license fee proceeds from revenues deposited to the credit of the Local Revenue Fund, the Controller shall make the following monthly deposits:

(1) To the Social Services Subaccount of the Vehicle License Fee Account, until the deposits equal the total amount that was allocated to the social services accounts of the local health and welfare trust funds in the prior fiscal year pursuant to this chapter from the Vehicle License Fee Account.

(2) To the Health Subaccount of the Vehicle License Fee Account, until the deposits equal the total amount that was allocated to the health
 accounts of the local health and welfare trust funds in the prior fiscal year pursuant to this chapter from the Vehicle License Fee Account and the Vehicle License Fee Growth Account.

(3) To the County Medical Services Program Subaccount of the Vehicle License Fee Account, until the deposits equal the total amount that was allocated to the County Medical Services Program in the prior fiscal year pursuant to this chapter from the Vehicle License Fee Account and the Vehicle License Fee Growth Account.

(4) To the Child Poverty and Family Supplemental Support Subaccount until the deposits equal the amounts that were deposited in the prior fiscal year from the Vehicle License Fee Account and the Vehicle License Fee Growth Account.

(5) To the Mental Health Subaccount of the Vehicle License Fee Account until the deposits
 equal the amounts that were allocated to counties’, cities’, and cities and counties’ CalWORKs Maintenance of Effort Subaccounts pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 17601.25, and any additional amounts above the amount specified in subdivision (a) of Section 17601.25 of the local health and welfare trust funds in the prior fiscal year pursuant to this chapter from the Vehicle License Fee Account and the Vehicle License Fee Growth Account. The Controller shall not include in this calculation any funding deposited in the Mental Health Subaccount from the Support Services Growth Subaccount pursuant to Section 30027.9 of the Government Code or funds described in subdivision (c) of Section 17601.25.

(6) Any excess vehicle license fee revenues received pursuant to Section 11001.5 of the Revenue and Taxation Code after the allocations required by paragraphs (1) to (5), inclusive, are made shall be deposited in the Vehicle License Fee Growth Account
 of the Local Revenue Fund.

(g) For the 2016–17 fiscal year and fiscal years thereafter, of the vehicle license fee proceeds from revenues deposited to the credit of the Local Revenue Fund, the Controller shall make the following monthly deposits:

(1) To the Social Services Subaccount until the deposits equal the amount that was deposited to the Social Services Subaccount in the prior fiscal year from the Vehicle License Fee Account and the Vehicle License Fee Growth Account.

(2) To the Health Subaccount until the deposits equal the total amounts that were deposited to the Health Subaccount in the prior fiscal year from the Vehicle License Fee Account and the Vehicle License Fee Growth Account.

(3) To the County Medical Services Program Subaccount until
 the deposits equal the total amounts that were deposited in the prior fiscal year to the County Medical Services Program Subaccount of the Vehicle License Fee Account and the County Medical Services Program Growth Subaccount of the Vehicle License Fee Growth Account.

(4) To the Child Poverty and Family Supplemental Support Subaccount until the deposits equal the amounts that were deposited to the Child Poverty and Family Supplemental Support Subaccount in the prior fiscal year from the Vehicle License Fee Account and the Vehicle License Fee Growth Account.

(5) To the Mental Health Subaccount of the Vehicle License Fee Account until the deposits equal the amounts that were allocated to counties’, cities’, and cities and counties’ CalWORKs Maintenance of Effort Subaccounts pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 17601.25, and any additional amounts above the amount specified in
 subdivision (a) of Section 17601.25 of the local health and welfare trust funds in the prior fiscal year pursuant to this chapter from the Vehicle License Fee Account and the Vehicle License Fee Growth Account. The Controller shall not include in this calculation any funding deposited in the Mental Health Subaccount from the Support Services Growth Subaccount pursuant to Section 30027.9 of the Government Code or funds described in subdivision (c) of Section 17601.25.

(6) Any excess vehicle license fee revenues received pursuant to Section 11001.5 of the Revenue and Taxation Code after the allocations required by paragraphs (1) to (5), inclusive, are made shall be deposited in the Vehicle License Fee Growth Account of the Local Revenue Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 25, Sec. 32.   (SB 90)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Growth Account Allocations—Deposits [17605. - 17605.10.]

17605.

(a) For the 1992–93 fiscal year, the Controller shall deposit into the Caseload Subaccount of the Sales Tax Growth Account of the Local Revenue Fund, from revenues deposited into the Sales Tax Growth Account, an amount to be determined by the Department of Finance, that represents the sum of the shortfalls between the actual realignment revenues received by each county and each city and county from the Social Services Subaccount of the Local Revenue Fund in the 1991–92 fiscal year and the net costs incurred by each of those counties and cities and counties in the fiscal year for the programs described in Sections 10101, 10101.1, 11322.2, 12306, 15200, 15204.2, and 18906.5, and former Section 11322. The Department of Finance shall provide the Controller with an allocation schedule on or before August 15, 1993, that shall be used
 by the Controller to allocate funds deposited to the Caseload Subaccount under this subdivision. The Controller shall allocate these funds no later than August 27, 1993.

(b) (1) (A) For the 1993–94 fiscal year and fiscal years thereafter, the Controller shall deposit into the Caseload Subaccount of the Sales Tax Growth Account of the Local Revenue Fund, from revenues deposited into the Sales Tax Growth Account, an amount determined by the Department of Finance, in consultation with the appropriate state departments and the California State Association of Counties, that is sufficient to fund the net cost for the realigned portion of the county or city and county share of growth in social services caseloads, as specified in paragraph (2), and any share of growth from the previous year or years for which sufficient revenues were not available in the Caseload Subaccount. The Department of Finance shall
 provide the Controller with an allocations schedule on or before March 15 of each year. The schedule shall be used by the Controller to allocate funds deposited into the Caseload Subaccount under this subdivision.

(B) It is the intent of the Legislature that counties shall receive allocations from the Caseload Subaccount as soon as possible after funds are received in the Sales Tax Growth Account. The Department of Finance shall recommend to the Legislature, by January 10, 2005, a procedure to expedite the preparation and provision of the allocations schedule described in subparagraph (A) and the allocation of funds by the Controller.

(2) (A) (i) For the 1992–93 fiscal year through the caseload growth calculation for the 2017–18 fiscal year, “growth” means, for purposes of this subdivision, the increase in the actual caseload
 expenditures for the prior fiscal year over the actual caseload expenditures for the fiscal year preceding the prior fiscal year for the programs described in Sections 10101, 12306, 15200, 15204.2, and 18906.5, and for which funds are allocated pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 123940 of the Health and Safety Code.

(ii) Commencing with the caseload growth calculation for the 2018–19 fiscal year and through the 2020–21 fiscal year, for purposes of this subdivision, “growth” means the increase in the actual caseload expenditures for the prior fiscal year over the actual caseload expenditures for the fiscal year preceding the prior fiscal year for the programs described in Sections 10101, 15200, 15204.2, and 18906.5, and for which funds are allocated pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 123940 of the Health and Safety Code.

(B) Commencing with the caseload growth calculation
 for the 2017–18 fiscal year and through the 2020–21 fiscal year, in addition to subparagraph (A), “growth” shall also include the following:

(i) The additional County IHSS MOE costs to counties pursuant to Sections 12306.16 and 12306.17 for the current fiscal year over the County IHSS MOE costs to counties for the prior fiscal year, less the amount of sales tax revenues received pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 17600.15 to fund the amount specified in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (f) of Section 17600.15 and the amount of vehicle license fee revenues received pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 17606.20, and, for the 2016–17 fiscal year, the amount of sales tax revenues received pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 17605.07 and subdivision (g) of Section 17606.10.

(ii) Any additional County IHSS MOE costs to counties pursuant to Sections 12306.16 and
 12306.17 for the prior fiscal year over the County IHSS MOE costs to counties for the preceding prior fiscal year that were not included in caseload growth calculation pursuant to clause (i) from the prior caseload growth calculation.

(3) (A) For the 1993–94 fiscal year through the 2016–17 fiscal year, the difference in caseload expenditures between the fiscal years shall be multiplied by the factors that represent the change in county or city and county shares of the realigned programs. These products shall then be added or subtracted, taking into account whether the county’s or city and county’s share of costs was increased or decreased as a result of realignment, to yield each county’s or city and county’s allocation for caseload growth. Allocations for counties or cities and counties with allocations of less than zero shall be set at zero.

(B) For the
 caseload growth calculation for the 2017–18 fiscal year the difference in caseload expenditures between the fiscal years as determined by clause (i) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) shall be multiplied by the factors that represent the change in county or city and county shares of the realignment programs. These products shall then be added or subtracted, taking into account whether the county’s or city and county’s share of costs was increased or decreased as a result of realignment, and added to the amounts determined pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) to yield each county’s or city and county’s allocation for caseload growth. Allocations for counties or cities and counties with allocations of less than zero shall be set at zero.

(C) Commencing with the caseload growth calculation for the 2018–19 fiscal year and through the 2020–21 fiscal year, the difference in caseload expenditures between the fiscal years as determined by
 clause (ii) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) shall be multiplied by the factors that represent the change in county or city and county shares of the realignment programs. These products shall then be added or subtracted, taking into account whether the county’s or city and county’s share of costs was increased or decreased as a result of realignment, and added to the amounts determined pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) to yield each county’s or city and county’s allocation for caseload growth. Allocations for counties or cities and counties with allocations of less than zero shall be set at zero.

(4) (A) Commencing with the caseload growth calculation for the 2021–22 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, “growth” means, for purposes of this subdivision, the increase in the actual caseload expenditures for the prior fiscal year over the actual caseload expenditures for the fiscal year preceding the
 prior fiscal year for the programs described in Sections 10101, 12306, 15200, 15204.2, and 18906.5, and for which funds are allocated pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 123940 of the Health and Safety Code.

(B) The difference in caseload expenditures between the fiscal years shall be multiplied by the factors that represent the change in county or city and county shares of the realigned programs. These products shall then be added or subtracted, taking into account whether the county’s or city and county’s share of costs was increased or decreased as a result of realignment, to yield each county’s or city and county’s allocation for caseload growth. Allocations for counties or cities and counties with allocations of less than zero shall be set at zero.

(c) Annually, the Controller shall allocate, to the local health and welfare trust fund social services account, the amounts
 deposited and remaining unexpended and unreserved in the Caseload Subaccount, pursuant to the schedules of allocations of caseload growth described in subdivision (b), within 45 days of receiving those schedules from the Department of Finance. If there are insufficient funds to fully satisfy all caseload growth obligations, each county’s or city and county’s allocation for each program specified in subdivision (d) shall be prorated.

(d) Prior to allocating funds pursuant to subdivision (b), to the extent that funds are available from funds deposited in the Caseload Subaccount in the Sales Tax Growth Account in the Local Revenue Fund, the Controller shall allocate moneys to counties or cities and counties to correct any inequity or inequities in the computation of the child welfare services portion of the schedule required by subdivision (a) of Section 17602.

(e) (1) For the 2003–04 fiscal year, no Sales Tax Growth Account funds shall be allocated pursuant to this chapter until the caseload portion of the base of each county’s social services account in the county’s health and welfare trust fund is funded to the level of the 2001–02 fiscal year. Funds to meet this requirement shall be allocated from the Sales Tax Account of the Local Revenue Fund. If sufficient funds are not available in the Sales Tax Account of the Local Revenue Fund to achieve that funding level in the 2003–04 fiscal year, this requirement shall be funded in each succeeding fiscal year in which there are sufficient funds in the Sales Tax Account of the Local Revenue Fund until the caseload base funding level for which each county would have otherwise been eligible in accordance with subdivision (e) of Section 17602 for that year.

(2) The caseload portion of each county’s social services account base shall be determined by
 subtracting its noncaseload portion of the base, as determined by the Department of Finance in its annual calculation of General Growth Account allocations, from the total base of each county’s social services account for the 2001–02 fiscal year.

(f) Commencing with the caseload growth calculation for the 2017–18 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, the Controller shall annually post on the Controller’s internet website the total amount of unfunded caseload growth by county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 27, Sec. 111.   (SB 80)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

17605.051.

Upon request of the County Medical Services Program Governing Board, the Controller shall transfer amounts deposited into the County Medical Services Program Subaccount to the County Medical Services Program Governing Board for the purposes described in subdivision (f) of Section 16809.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 20, Sec. 40.   (SB 79)   Effective June 24, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

17605.07.

(a) (1) For the 1992–93 fiscal year through the 2014–15 fiscal year, inclusive, after satisfying the obligations set forth in Section 17605, the Controller shall deposit into the County Medical Services Program Subaccount 4.027 percent of the amounts remaining and unexpended in the Sales Tax Growth Account of the Local Revenue Fund.

(2) If the amount deposited to the Caseload Subaccount of the Sales Tax Growth Account pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 17605 exceeds twenty million dollars ($20,000,000) for any fiscal year, then an additional amount equal to 4.027 percent of the amount deposited to the Caseload Subaccount shall be deposited to the County Medical Services Program Subaccount of the Sales Tax Growth Account.

(b) (1) For the 2015–16 fiscal year through the 2018–19 fiscal year, after satisfying the obligations set forth in Section 17605, the Controller shall deposit into the County Medical Services Program Growth Subaccount 4.027 percent of the amounts remaining and unexpended in the Sales Tax Growth Account of the Local Revenue Fund.

(2) If the amount deposited to the Caseload Subaccount of the Sales Tax Growth Account pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 17605 exceeds twenty million dollars ($20,000,000) for any fiscal year between the 2015–16 and 2018–19 fiscal years, inclusive, then an additional amount equal to 4.027 percent of the amount deposited to the Caseload Subaccount shall be deposited to the County Medical Services Program Growth Subaccount of the Sales Tax Growth Account.

(c) (1) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), for the 2016–17 fiscal year, the Controller shall allocate to the social services account of each county and city and county the amount that would otherwise have been deposited into the County Medical Services Program Growth Subaccount pursuant to subdivision (b), except for the amount of funds to be redirected pursuant to Section 17600.50, based on a schedule provided by the Department of Finance developed in consultation with the California State Association of Counties.

(2) The funding allocated pursuant to paragraph (1) shall only be available for allocation to the counties that participate in the County Medical Services Program in the 2016–17 fiscal year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 27, Sec. 112.   (SB 80)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

17605.10.

(a) For the 2014–15 fiscal year through the 2018–19 fiscal years, after satisfying the obligations set forth in Sections 17605 and 17605.07, the Controller shall deposit any funds remaining in the Sales Tax Growth Account of the Local Revenue Fund into the General Growth Subaccount.

(b) For the 2019–20 fiscal year and every fiscal year thereafter, after satisfying the obligations set forth in Section 17605, the Controller shall deposit any funds remaining in the Sales Tax Growth Account of the Local Revenue Fund into the General Growth Subaccount.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 27, Sec. 113.   (SB 80)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Allocation of Funds from the Sales Tax Growth Account [17606.10. - 17606.20.]

17606.10.

(a) For the 1992–93 fiscal year and subsequent fiscal years, the Controller shall allocate funds, on an annual basis from the General Growth Subaccount in the Sales Tax Growth Account to the appropriate accounts in the local health and welfare trust fund of each county, city, and city and county in accordance with a schedule setting forth the percentage of total state resources received in the 1990–91 fiscal year, including State Legalization Impact Assistance Grants distributed by the state under former Part 4.5 (commencing with Section 16700), funding provided for purposes of implementation of Division 5 (commencing with Section 5000), for the organization and financing of community mental health services, including the Cigarette and Tobacco Products Surtax proceeds that are allocated to county mental health programs
 pursuant to Chapter 1331 of the Statutes of 1989, Chapter 51 of the Statutes of 1990, and Chapter 1323 of the Statutes of 1990, and state hospital funding and funding distributed for programs administered under Sections 1794, 10101.1, and 11322.2, as annually adjusted by the Department of Finance, in conjunction with the appropriate state department to reflect changes in equity status from the base percentages. However, for the 1992–93 fiscal year, the allocation for community mental health services shall be based on the following schedule:Percentageof StatewideJurisdictionResource BaseAlameda 4.3693Alpine 0.0128Amador 0.0941Butte 0.7797Calaveras 0.1157Colusa 0.0847Contra Costa 2.3115Del Norte 0.1237El Dorado 0.3966Fresno 3.1419Glenn 0.1304Humboldt 0.6175Imperial 0.5425Inyo 0.1217Kern 1.8574Kings 0.4229Lake 0.2362Lassen 0.1183Los Angeles27.9666 Madera 0.3552Marin 0.9180Mariposa 0.0792Mendocino 0.4099Merced 0.8831Modoc 0.0561Mono 0.0511Monterey 1.1663Napa 0.3856Nevada 0.2129Orange 5.3423Placer 0.5034Plumas 0.1134Riverside 3.6179Sacramento 4.1872San Benito 0.1010San Bernardino 4.5494San Diego 7.8773San Francisco 3.5335San Joaquin 2.4690San Luis Obispo 0.6652San Mateo 2.5169Santa Barbara 1.0745Santa Clara 5.0488Santa Cruz 0.7960Shasta 0.5493Sierra 0.0345Siskiyou 0.2051Solano 0.6694Sonoma 1.1486Stanislaus 1.4701Sutter/Yuba 0.6294Tehama 0.2384Trinity 0.0826Tulare 1.4704Tuolumne 0.1666Ventura 1.9311Yolo 0.5443Berkeley 0.2688Tri-City 0.2347(b) The Department of Finance shall recalculate the resource base used in determining the General
 Growth Subaccount allocations to the Health Account, Mental Health Account, and Social Services Account of the local health and welfare trust fund of each city, county, and city and county for the 1994–95 fiscal year general growth allocations according to subdivisions (c) and (d). For the 1995–96 fiscal year and annually until the end of the 2012–13 fiscal year, the Department of Finance shall prepare the schedule of allocations of growth based upon the recalculation of the resource base as provided by subdivision (c).

(c) For the Mental Health Account, the Department of Finance shall do all of the following:

(1) Use the following sources as reported by the State Department of Health Care Services:

(A) The final December 1992 distribution of resources associated with Institutes for Mental Disease.

(B) The 1990–91 fiscal year state hospitals and community mental health allocations.

(C) Allocations for services provided for under Chapter 1294 of the Statutes of 1989.

(2) Expand the resource base with the following nonrealigned funding sources as allocated among the counties:

(A) Tobacco surtax allocations made under Chapter 1331 of the Statutes of 1989 and Chapter 51 of the Statutes of 1990.

(B) For the 1994–95 allocation year only, Chapter 1323 of the Statutes of 1990.

(C) 1993–94 fiscal year federal homeless block grant allocation.

(D) 1993–94 fiscal year
 Mental Health Special Education allocations.

(E) 1993–94 fiscal year allocations for the system of care for children, in accordance with Chapter 1229 of the Statutes of 1992.

(F) 1993–94 fiscal year federal Substance Abuse and Mental Health Services Administration block grant allocations pursuant to Subchapter 1 (commencing with Section 10801) of Chapter 114 of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(d) For the Health Account, the Department of Finance shall use the historical resource base of state funds as allocated among the counties, cities, and city and county as reported by the former State Department of Health Services in a September 17, 1991, report of Indigent and Community Health Resources.

(e) The Department of Finance shall use these adjusted
 resource bases for the Health Account and Mental Health Account to calculate what the 1994–95 fiscal year General Growth Subaccount allocations would have been, and together with 1994–95 fiscal year Base Restoration Subaccount allocations, CMSP subaccount allocations, equity allocations to the Health Account and Mental Health Account as adjusted by subparagraph (E) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 17606.05, as that subparagraph read on January 1, 2015, and special equity allocations to the Health Account and Mental Health Account as adjusted by subdivision (e) of Section 17606.15 reconstruct the 1994–95 fiscal year General Growth Subaccount resource base for the 1995–96 allocation year for each county, city, and city and county. Notwithstanding any other law, the actual 1994–95 general growth allocations shall not become part of the realignment base allocations to each county, city, and city and county. The total amounts distributed by the Controller for general growth for the 1994–95
 allocation year shall be reallocated among the counties, cities, and city and county in the 1995–96 allocation year according to this paragraph, and shall be included in the general growth resource base for the 1996–97 allocation year and each fiscal year thereafter. For the 1996–97 allocation year through the 2017–18 fiscal year, the Department of Finance shall update the base with actual growth allocations to the Health Account, Mental Health Account, and Social Services Account of each county, city, and city and county local health and welfare trust fund in the prior year, and adjust for actual changes in nonrealigned funds specified in subdivision (c) in the year prior to the allocation year.

(f) For the 2013–14 fiscal year through the 2017–18 fiscal year, the Controller shall do all of the following:

(1) Allocate to the Mental Health Account of each county, city, or city and
 county based on a schedule provided by the Department of Finance. The Department of Finance shall recalculate the resource base used in determining the General Growth Subaccount allocations to the Mental Health Account in accordance with subdivision (c) and allocate based on that recalculation.

(2) Allocate 18.4545 percent of the total General Growth Subaccount to the health account of each county, city, or city and county based on a schedule provided by the Department of Finance in accordance with subdivision (d).

(3) Allocate the remainder of the funds in the General Growth Subaccount to the family support account of each county or city and county based on a schedule provided by the Department of Finance. These funds shall be expended in accordance with Section 17601.50.

(g) (1) Notwithstanding subdivision (f), for the 2016–17 fiscal year, the Controller shall allocate funds in the following amounts from the General Growth Subaccount of the Sales Tax Account to the social services account of each county and city and county based on a schedule provided by the Department of Finance developed in consultation with the California State Association of Counties:

(A) The funding that would have been allocated to the Mental Health Account of each county or city and county pursuant to the calculations specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (f).

(B) The funding that would have been allocated to the health account of each county or city and county pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (f), except for the amount of funds to be redirected pursuant to Section 17600.50, Article 12 (commencing with Section 17612.1), and Article 13 (commencing with
 17613.1).

(2) The allocation of funds from the General Growth Subaccount of the Sales Tax Account to the social services account as described in paragraph (1) shall not apply to the amount of funds available for allocation to the Mental Health Accounts and health accounts of the Cities of Berkeley, Pasadena, Tri-City, and Long Beach.

(h) For the 2018–19 fiscal year and every fiscal year thereafter, the Controller shall do all of the following:

(1) Allocate 37.433321 percent of the total General Growth Subaccount to the Mental Health Account of each county, city, or city and county using the 2017–18 fiscal year percentage distribution of general growth for mental health.

(2) Allocate 18.4545 percent of the total General Growth Subaccount to the health
 account of each county, city, or city and county using the 2017–18 fiscal year percentage distribution of general growth for health.

(3) Allocate the remainder of the funds in the General Growth Subaccount to the family support account of each county or city and county based on a schedule provided by the Department of Finance. These funds shall be expended in accordance with Section 17601.50.

(i) The amounts deposited and remaining unexpended and unreserved in the General Growth Subaccount shall be allocated on an annual basis by the Controller, as described in subdivisions (f) and (g), within 45 days of receiving the General Growth Subaccount allocation schedule from the Department of Finance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 27, Sec. 114.   (SB 80)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

17606.20.

(a) Annually, the Controller shall allocate money to each county, city, and city and county, from revenues deposited in the Vehicle License Fee Growth Account in the Local Revenue Fund in amounts that are proportional to each county’s, city’s, or city and county’s total allocation from the Sales Tax Growth Account, except amounts provided pursuant to Section 17605.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), for the 1998–99 fiscal year through the 2018–19 fiscal year, if, after meeting the requirements of Section 17605, there are no funds remaining in the Sales Tax Growth Account to allocate to each county, city, and city and county pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of, or paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of, Section 17605.07, or Section 17605.10, the
 Controller shall allocate the revenues deposited in the Vehicle License Fee Growth Account to each county, city, and city and county, in the following manner:

(1) The Controller shall determine the amount of sales tax growth in the 1996–97 fiscal year that exceeded the requirements of Section 17605 in the 1996–97 fiscal year.

(2) The Controller shall determine the amount of sales tax growth allocated in the 1996–97 fiscal year to the County Medical Services Program Subaccount pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 17605.07, and to the Indigent Health Equity, Community Health Equity, Mental Health Equity, State Hospital Mental Health Equity, General Growth, and Special Equity Subaccounts pursuant to Section 17605.10, as that section read on January 1, 2015.

(3) The Controller shall compute percentages
 by dividing the amounts determined in paragraph (2) by the amount determined in paragraph (1).

(4) For calculation purposes related to paragraph (5), the Controller shall apply the percentages determined in paragraph (3) to revenues in the Vehicle License Fee Growth Account to determine the amount of vehicle license fee growth revenues attributable to the County Medical Services Program Growth, Indigent Health Equity, Community Health Equity, Mental Health Equity, State Hospital Mental Health Equity, General Growth, and Special Equity Subaccounts. This paragraph shall not require the Controller to deposit vehicle license fee growth revenues into the subaccounts specified in this paragraph, and is solely for determining the distribution of vehicle license growth revenues to each county, city, and city and county.

(5) Annually, the Controller shall allocate money to each county,
 city, and city and county, from revenues deposited in the Vehicle License Fee Growth Account in the Local Revenue Fund. These allocations shall be determined based on schedules developed by the Department of Finance pursuant to Section 17606.10, in consultation with the California State Association of Counties. The Controller shall allocate these funds within 45 days of receiving the schedules from the Department of Finance.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivisions (a) and (b), for the 2016–17 fiscal year and through the 2018–19 fiscal year, the Controller shall allocate funds in the following amounts from the Vehicle License Fee Growth Account to the social services account of each county or city and county based on a schedule provided by the Department of Finance developed in consultation with the California Association of Counties:

(1) (A) For the 2016–17,
 2017–18, and 2018–19 fiscal years, 100 percent of the funding from the Vehicle License Fee Growth Account that would have been allocated to the mental health account and health account of each county or city and county pursuant to calculations specified in subdivision (b) of this section or paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (f) of Section 17606.10.

(B) For the 2016–17, 2017–18, and 2018–19 fiscal years, 100 percent of the funding from the Vehicle License Fee Growth Account that would have been allocated to the County Medical Services Program Growth Subaccount.

(2) (A) The funding from the Vehicle License Fee Growth Account to be allocated to the social services account of each county or city and county pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) in each fiscal year, shall only be available for allocation to the counties that participate in the County
 Medical Services Program in that fiscal year.

(B) If in any fiscal year in which the funds specified in subparagraph (A) are not fully allocated to the counties that participate in the County Medical Services Program, the remaining funds shall be available for allocation to counties that participate in the County Medical Services Program in the following fiscal year.

(3) The redirection of funds in the Vehicle License Fee Growth Account to the social services subaccount described in paragraphs (1) and (2) shall not apply to the amount of Vehicle License Fee growth available for deposit into the Health and Mental Health Subaccounts for the Cities of Berkeley, Pasadena, Tri-City, and Long Beach.

(4) The Controller shall allocate these funds within 14 days of receiving the schedules from the Department of Finance.

(d) For the 2017–18 and 2018–19 fiscal years, the State Controller shall post a calculation of the Vehicle License Fee growth revenue that the Health, Mental Health, and County Medical Services Program Subaccounts would have otherwise received if subdivision (c) were not in effect.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 27, Sec. 115.   (SB 80)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. County Matching Fund Requirements [17608.05. - 17608.10.]

17608.05.

(a) As a condition of deposit of funds from the Sales Tax Account of the Local Revenue Fund into a county’s local health and welfare trust fund mental health account, the county or city shall deposit each month local matching funds in accordance with a schedule developed by the State Department of Mental Health based on county or city standard matching obligations for the 1990–91 fiscal year for mental health programs.

(b) A county, city, or city and county may limit its deposit of matching funds to the amount necessary to meet minimum federal maintenance of effort requirements, as calculated by the State Department of Health Care Services, subject to the approval of the
 Department of Finance. However, the amount of the reduction permitted by the limitation provided for by this subdivision shall not exceed twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000) per fiscal year on a statewide basis.

(c) Any county, city, or city and county that elects not to apply maintenance of effort funds for community mental health programs shall not use the loss of these expenditures from local mental health programs for realignment purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 20, Sec. 50.   (SB 79)   Effective June 24, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

17608.10.
